District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.10

Restrictions on dividends.

A domestic title insurer shall only declare or distribute a dividend to shareholders without the prior written approval of the Commissioner as would be permitted under § 31-706, for insurers other than life insurers.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2151, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).